Utah statutes.
58-31b-306.   APRN intern license.

(1) (a)  The division may issue an APRN intern license to a person who meets all qualifications for a license as an advanced practice registered nurse under this chapter, except for the passing of required examinations, if the applicant:

(i)  is a graduate of an approved nursing education program within the year immediately preceding application for an intern license;

(ii)  has never before taken the examinations; and

(iii)  submits to the division evidence of having secured employment conditioned upon issuance of the APRN intern license, and the employment is under the supervision of an advanced practice registered nurse or physician as defined by division rule.

(b)  An APRN intern license issued under Subsection (1)(a) expires on the earlier of:

(i)  a date following a period established by division rule;

(ii)  the date upon which the division receives notice from the examination agency that the individual failed to take or pass the examinations upon notification to the applicant; or

(iii)  the date upon which the division issues the individual an APRN license.

(2)  An applicant specializing in psychiatric mental health nursing may be issued an APRN intern license upon completion of all licensure requirements, except for the passing of required examinations and completion of required clinical practice hours.

(3) (a)  The division may issue an APRN intern license to a person who meets all qualifications for a license as an advanced practice registered nurse under this chapter, except course work in patient assessment or pharmacotherapeutics, if that applicant:

(i)  is licensed in good standing as an advanced practice registered nurse in another state or jurisdiction; and

(ii)  submits to the division evidence of having secured employment conditioned upon issuance of the APRN intern license, and the employment is under the supervision of an advanced practice registered nurse or physician as defined by division rule.

(b)  An APRN intern license issued under Subsection (3)(a) expires on the earlier of:

(i)  a date following a period established by division rule; or

(ii)  the date upon which the division issues the individual a regular license.



Enacted by Chapter 288, 1998 General Session

